Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Department of Health

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to duty of legislature to protect and promote the health and morality of the people, see art. 7, § 20, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Social worker malpractice, 58 ALR4th 977.

§ 9-2-101.
Creation; definitions; divisions.

The department of health is created.

As used in this article:

“Department” means the department of health;

“Director” means the director of the department.

The department is the successor to the board and department of health.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

The department consists of the director who is the chief administrative officer and such divisions as the director may create.

The director shall appoint and prescribe the duties of officers of the institutions in title 25 under the direct authority and control of the department.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2, 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-160.1, 9-160.2, 9-160.4; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-101

,

9-3-102

,

9-3-104

; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1981, ch. 155, § 2; 1982, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 63, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, §§ 2, 3; 2019 ch. 175, § 2, effective March 8, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to vocational rehabilitation, see §

9-2-109

through

9-2-115

.

The 2019 amendment,

in (b), substituted “this article” for “W.S.

9-2-101

through

9-2-108

.”

Laws 2019, ch. 175, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

Satisfaction of judgment against department out of state treasury. —

Since the career service council, the department of health and social services (now department of health) and the department of administration and fiscal control are nothing less than extensions of the state, any judgment award against them would unquestionably be satisfied out of the state treasury. Atchison v. Nelson, 460 F. Supp. 1102, 1978 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14320 (D. Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-2-102.
Department of health; duties and responsibilities; state grants.

The department of health is the state mental health authority, the developmental disabilities authority and the substance abuse authority. The department through its divisions has the following duties and responsibilities to:

Administer comprehensive state programs for mental health, developmental disabilities and substance abuse services;

Provide a coordinated network of programs and facilities offering the following services to persons afflicted with mental illness or developmental disabilities or for substance abuse: diagnosis, treatment, education, care, training, community living, habilitation and rehabilitation;

Establish minimum standards and approve policies and procedures for the establishment and operation of community-based mental health, substance abuse and developmental disabilities programs receiving state support. The department through its mental health division and its substance abuse division shall annually withhold not less than five percent (5%) of all amounts provided in each contract with a community-based mental health, substance abuse or drug court program or provider and shall not release the funds withheld to the individual program or provider until the respective division and the individual program or provider enter into a written agreement that provides for performance and outcome measures. If the respective division and an individual program or provider do not enter into a mutually agreed upon set of performance and outcome measures, the funds withheld under this paragraph shall revert to the budget reserve account at the end of the biennium in which the funds were withheld;

Establish minimum standards for all mental health, substance abuse and developmental disabilities services supported by state funds;

Establish a statewide suicide prevention program that includes:

A statewide written plan adopted by the department following at least one (1) statewide public meeting of interested persons and entities;

Assistance to local communities in the development and maintenance of suicide prevention coalitions;

Consultation, technical assistance and training to state and local agencies, organizations and professional groups;

Maintenance of a library of suicide prevention materials and information which shall include copies of or links to Cochrane collaboration systematic reviews or other similar sources relevant to this subject;

Collection and dissemination of information regarding best practices for suicide prevention and intervention.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 3.

The program may include state grants based on a formula for state and local participation.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 31, § 2.

through (n) Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 4; ch. 221, § 3.

The department shall provide to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, and any other appropriate legislative committee, periodic reports from the department’s internal performance measurement system.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-160.4:1; W.S. 1977, §

9-3-105

; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1981, ch. 155, § 2; 1982, ch. 43, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 115, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 4; ch. 221, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 81, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 229, § 1; 2007, ch. 129, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 1, effective February 26, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to department of health's duty to create an substance abuse control plan, see §

9-2-122

.

As to meaning of “shelter,” see § 35-1-613(a)(xiii).

The 2005 amendment

added (a)(v).

Laws 2005, ch. 229, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

The 2007 amendment

added the second sentence in (a)(iii).

Laws 2007, ch. 129, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2007.

The 2015 amendment,

added (o).

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 229, § 3, appropriates $150,000 to the department of health from the general fund for the purposes of the act and authorizes one additional full-time position for the department of health to carry out the responsibilities created by the act.

Laws 2009, ch. 13, §§ 1 and 2 provide:

“Section 1. Mental health crisis stabilization.

“(a)

There is appropriated seven hundred seventy thousand dollars ($770,000.00) or as much thereof as necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2009 and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of developing and enhancing mental health crisis stabilization services provided within the Basin region designated by the department of health. The program receiving this appropriation in the region shall be selected by the department of health, in consultation with the mental health and substance abuse services division, through a competitive bid process. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall be included in the department's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request.

“(b)

There is appropriated one hundred forty-eight thousand dollars ($148,000.00), or as much thereof as necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2009 and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of developing and enhancing mental health crisis stabilization services provided within the southeast region designated by the department of health. The program receiving this appropriation in the region shall be selected by the department of health, in consultation with the mental health and substance abuse services division, through a competitive bid process. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall be included in the department's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request.

“Section 2. Regions of the state.

“(a)

For purposes of this act, the five (5) regions of the state designated by the department of health include:

“(i)

The southeast region, comprised of Albany, Carbon, Goshen, Laramie and Platte counties;

“(ii)

The central region, comprised of Converse, Fremont, Natrona and Niobrara counties;

“(iii)

The northeast region, comprised of Campbell, Crook, Johnson, Sheridan and Weston counties;

“(iv)

The west region, comprised of Lincoln, Sublette, Sweetwater, Teton and Uinta counties; and

“(v)

The Basin region, comprised of Big Horn, Hot Springs, Park and Washakie counties.”

Study. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch 4, § 6, directs the department of health to evaluate the need for a medical safety event reporting system plan, considering: (1) the needed uses for the information reported; (2) the definition of information to be reported; (3) the mechanics of the reporting system and the costs of the system to both health care facilities and the state; (4) the extent the information reported should be confidential and protected from discovery in legal actions; (5) the sanctions for failure to comply with the reporting requirement; (6) the extent to which existing reporting systems meet the needs for reporting; (7) the extent to which there should be a staff to analyze individual reports and assist the health care facilities in re-engineering their systems and making changes to prevent future errors; (8) the degree and form of public reporting of the data and the degree to which risk adjustment of the data is appropriate; and (9) the experience of other states with similar reporting systems. The department is to make a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by October 15, 2004.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 9(c), appropriates $70,000 or so much thereof as is necessary from the general fund to the department of health for the purposes of the act. Subsection 9(d) appropriates $50,000 or so much thereof as is necessary from the general fund to the department for the purposes of evaluating the need for a medical safety event reporting system.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch 4, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 29, 2004.

Task force. —

Laws 2005, ch. 125, § 1, directs the state health officer and the department of health in collaboration with the Wyoming department of agriculture and the Wyoming department of environmental quality to convene a multi-disciplinary task force to conduct a study of environmental health issues currently identified, the state and federal agencies to whom those issues are currently assigned and those environmental health threats identified but not clearly assigned to a particular state agency. The study is to examine overlapping governmental jurisdiction and jurisdictional gaps in environmental health matters and, to the extent needed, recommend solutions to these problems. The department is to produce and submit a comprehensive plan to coordinate and clarify agency responsibility for environmental health issues, together with recommendations for any initial legislation, to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by November 15, 2005. The act appropriates $50,000 from the general fund to the department of health to implement the purposes of this act and further provides that the department of health may use existing resources and apply for any federal or private grants that may be available to augment funding for the required study and plan.

Laws 2005, ch. 125, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as required by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 48, as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, directs the department of health to develop a plan to reevaluate clients in the acquired brain injury program every five years, which plan is to consider needs for safety, protective shelter, sheltered work activities and medical management including medication and therapies necessary to maintain the level of self-sufficiency the client has obtained. Based on this reevaluation, individuals may need less intensive care. The department is to pursue procedures necessary to provide for rapid substitution of new clients for clients who leave the program.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, amends Laws 2004, ch. 95, section 48, to additionally provide that, notwithstanding Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 319, and any other provision of law, funds appropriated for the division of developmental disabilities are not to be transferred to any other agency, division or program. Funds appropriated but not used for the children's developmental disabilities waiver program, adult developmental disabilities waiver program, or the adult brain injury waiver program are to be expended for clients on waiting lists or identified, new emergency clients within the two waiver programs with the highest average waiting periods. The department may expand the number of clients served by each of the waivers to the extent sufficient funds are available from this appropriation and the expansion is consistent with federal requirements. The department is to report quarterly to the governor and the joint appropriations interim committee on the specific amounts transferred between any waiver programs, the total number of clients served in each waiver, the average projected cost of each client, the average individual budgeted amount for each client, the number of persons on the waiting list for each waiver, and the cost for each new client served. Any unexpended unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation on June 30, 2006, are to revert to the budget reserve account.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 229, § 2, directs the department of health to report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee by December 1, 2005, on its progress in implementing the statewide suicide prevention program created by the act, and by December 1, 2006, and December 1, 2007, on the benefits generated by the program.

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 129, § 2, provides: “W.S. 9-2-102(a)(iii), as amended by this act, shall apply to any contract entered into between the department of health, mental health division or substance abuse division, and a community-based mental health, substance abuse or drug court provider on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 9-2-103.
Division administrators; appointment; qualifications; duties; salaries, tenure and removal generally; necessary personnel.

The director shall appoint a separate administrator for the divisions of the department of health and he may discharge the administrators as provided in W.S. 9-2-1706(c)(ii). Appointments under this subsection shall be subject to the following:

The administrator for a division dealing primarily with public health shall:

Have theoretical knowledge and practical and managerial skill and experience which fits him for the position, as determined by the director; and

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 20, § 2.

Administer a program for the supervision of volunteer physicians who provide medical care, assistance or medical administrative services without charge for the medical services rendered in an eligible program in compliance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department. To qualify as an eligible program, the medical services shall be provided in any hospital, clinic, health care facility or institution owned or operated by the state, University of Wyoming or any local government. A disclosure statement shall be signed in advance by the recipients informing them of the physician’s limited liability under the program.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 59 § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 185, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 168, § 3.

The governor shall appoint a state health officer who shall be licensed in Wyoming as a physician and who shall carry out the statutory duties and any other duties assigned to the state health officer by the director. The state health officer shall:

Serve at the pleasure of the director and governor, either of whom may remove the state health officer;

Not be assigned to any division within the department;

Have support staff to carry out the duties assigned to him.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 93, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-160.5; Laws 1977, ch. 176, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-3-106

; Laws 1979, ch. 155, §§ 2, 3; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 185, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 221, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 159, § 1; 1998, ch. 20, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 104, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective February 26, 2015; 2021 ch. 168, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to the duty of the division of health and medical services relating to licensing of clinical laboratories and blood banks, see §§

33-34-101

through

33-34-109

.

The 2004 amendment

added (a)(ii), making related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 104, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2004.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(vii), substituted “9-2-2704” for “9-2-2706”

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 168, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in (e), substituted "governor" for "director," "the state health officer" for "him"; and rewrote (e)(i), which read, "Answer directly to the director."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 168, § 3, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (d), which read, "Where the director meets the qualifications specified in subsections (a) and (e) of this section and so chooses, the director may serve as the state health officer."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 168, § 4, provides: "This act shall only apply to orders issued by the state health officer or municipal, county or district health officers on or after the effective date of this act. No order issued before the effective date of this act shall be subject to this act during any period for which the public health order is effective."

Task force. —

Laws 2004, ch. 104, § 2, as amended by
Laws 2005, ch. 168, § 1, and
Laws 2006, ch. 26, § 1, creates the select committee on developmental programs, consisting of three members of the Senate, at least one of whom is a member of the senate labor, health and social services committee and provided that not more than two of the appointees are from the same political party, and four members of the house of representatives, at least two of whom are members of the house labor, health and social services committee and provided that not more than three of the appointees are from the same political party. The committee is to (1) study the state's programs for persons with developmental disabilities and other states' programs for the delivery of assistance to persons with developmental disabilities; (2) identify system changes for improvement in the delivery of services to persons with developmental disabilities; and (3) sponsor necessary legislation implementing committee recommendations. The committee is to report to the legislature and the governor not later than October 1, 2005, on conclusions and recommendations developed under this section and not later than December 1, 2007 on adoption and implementation of rules and regulations by the developmental disabilities division The act appropriates $35,000 from the general fund to the legislative service office to fund activities of the select committee, and an additional $17,000.00 to fund the activities of the select committee through December 31, 2007.

Laws 2005, ch. 168, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Laws 2004, ch. 104, § 3, directs the select committee, working with the developmental preschool centers in the state, to study the costs of providing developmental health and educational services to qualifying preschool children in the state. The committee may also contract with consultants in conducting the study. he study is to identify the costs of service provision and recommend a mechanism for funding the costs of providing the services. The committee is to provide a preliminary report to members of the legislature not later than November 1, 2004, and a final report by October 1, 2005 and submitted to the management council. The act appropriates $250,000 from the budget reserve account to the legislative service office for purposes of this study.

Laws 2004, ch. 104, § 4, directs the office of planning and administration within the department of health to review all program manuals and all internal operating procedures and policies affecting services provided by the division of developmental disabilities and ensure that all policies of general applicability are promulgated as rules in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2004, ch. 104, § 2, as amended by 2005 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 168, Section 1 and 2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 84, Section 1, by creating a new subsection (f) is amended to read:

“Section 2.

“(f)

The select committee shall report to the management council, joint labor, health and social services interim committee, joint appropriations interim committee and the governor not later than December 1, 2007 on:

“(i)

Adoption and implementation of rules and regulations by the developmental disabilities division;

“(ii)

A feasibility study on implementation of cost-based reimbursement mechanisms for services delivery in the adult, child and acquired brain injury programs of the developmental disabilities division;

“(iii)

Implementation of funding mechanisms in the developmental preschool program of the developmental disabilities division;

“(iv)

A transition plan for continued oversight of the developmental disabilities division by the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, especially in regard to the development of a real choice waiver program, the department of health's development of a long-term master facility and programming plan for the Wyoming state training school and a master plan for developmental disabilities programs, including a long-term facility and programming plan.”

Laws 2007, ch. 26, § 3, makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

§ 9-2-104.
Allocation, transfer and abolition of powers, duties and functions within department.

The governor may, after consultation with the director of the department and the departmental advisory council:

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

Designate the department as the single state agency for the administration of state plans for health and medical services, mental health and developmental disabilities, to administer upon such terms as the governor directs.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 93, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-160.6; Laws 1977, ch. 176, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-107; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 25, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, §§ 2, 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2000, ch. 50, § 2, effective July 1, 2000, transfers all funds and positions for the governor's planning council on developmental disabilities from the office of the governor to the office of the attorney general, effective July 1, 2000.

§ 9-2-105.
Office of planning and administration; created; duties and powers of administrator.

The office of planning and administration is created and shall be under the authority of the director.

The administrator of the office of planning and administration shall:

Coordinate all program administration, including all budget requests, grant applications and plans;

Advise, consult and cooperate with all departmental agencies, all other state departments, agencies, subdivisions and the federal government;

Require that all administrators within the department cooperate with the office and report to the office on all matters pertaining to program planning, budgeting and administration; and

Perform planning as determined by the director.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-160.6:1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-108; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to definition of “director,” see § 9-2-101(b)(ii).

§ 9-2-106.
Duties and powers of director of department.

The director shall:

Consult with the departmental advisory council and establish general policy to be followed in the department in administering programs;

Disburse and administer all federal funds or other monies allotted to the department;

Prescribe by rule, order or regulation the conditions under which these monies shall be disbursed and administered;

Enter into agreements, not inconsistent with the laws of this state, required as conditions precedent to receiving funds or other assistance. Funds appropriated by the legislature for operation of the department shall be used for the specified purposes only, and the director, in accepting funds from any other source, shall not consent to impairment of the department’s statutory responsibilities;

Hold hearings, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and take testimony as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] in all matters relating to the exercise and performance of the powers and duties vested in the department;

With the assistance of the attorney general bring actions in the courts of the state in the name of the department for the enforcement of public health, mental health and medical services laws; and

Ensure that the department and all of its divisions promulgate reasonable rules and regulations, after consultation with the departmental advisory council and in compliance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, for the implementation of all state and federal public health, mental health and medical services laws. When promulgating such rules and regulations the director shall assure that the department uses language which focuses on the importance of a person, rather than a person’s disability.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(iv) of this section, the director may use funds appropriated by the legislature for the operation of the department to pay health or medical insurance premiums for any resident of Wyoming upon a determination by the director or his designee that:

Due to an injury or illness, the person or his family is or may become unable to pay health or medical insurance premiums;

The person is or may become eligible for medical services which would be paid for by the state; and

Payment of the premiums may be less expensive for the state than payment of the medical services.

Health or medical insurance premiums paid for in accordance with subsection (b) of this section shall be reviewed periodically to ensure payment of the premiums does not exceed the cost for provision of medical services. The authority granted under subsection (b) of this section shall terminate effective June 30, 1996.

The director may authorize the Wyoming life resource center, the Wyoming state hospital, the Wyoming pioneer home, the veterans’ home of Wyoming, the Wyoming retirement center and the Wyoming veterans’ skilled nursing facility to provide services to persons with conditions other than those specified in the provisions governing those state institutions in title 25 of the Wyoming statutes when the director determines that there is a need for such services, that the services can be provided effectively by the institution, that the services shall be delivered in a manner that assures the safety of all individuals served by the institution and the services provided are statutorily authorized for any of these institutions, the service needs are similar to those authorized for any of these institutions or the services are necessary to protect the public health and safety. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations and policies and procedures necessary to implement this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize the director to eliminate services that are otherwise required by statute.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 93, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-160.7; Laws 1977, ch. 105, § 2; ch. 176, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-109; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1994, ch. 9, § 1; 1998, ch. 11, § 1; 2000, ch. 5, § 1; 2004, ch. 104, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; ch. 70, § 1; ch. 85, § 1; 2019 ch. 156, § 2, effective February 28, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to definition of “director,” see § 9-2-101(b)(ii).

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(vii), added “Ensure that the department and all of its divisions” at the beginning, and made related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 104, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2004.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 44, §
1, substituted “life resource center” for “state training school” and made stylistic changes in (d).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 70, §
1, added the second sentence of (a)(vii).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The third 2008 amendment, by ch. 85, §
1, effective July 1, 2008, deleted the last sentence in (d), which read: “The director shall report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee no later than October 1 of odd numbered years with respect to the status of any actions taken under this subsection and the results of those actions.”

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given
effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

in (d), added “and the Wyoming veterans' skilled nursing facility” and made related changes.

Laws 2019, ch. 156, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-2-107.
Division advisory councils; appointment; departmental advisory council; created; term; composition; meetings; removal of members; selection of officers; vacancies; expenses.

The director may appoint an advisory council, each of which shall consist of not more than ten (10) members unless otherwise required by law or good practice, to each of the divisions of the department.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 37, § 2

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

through (h) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 37, § 2

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 93, §§ 8, 12, 13, 15, 16; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-160.8, 9-160.12, 9-160.13, 9-160.15, 9-160.16; Laws 1977, ch. 176, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-110, 9-3-112 to 9-3-115; Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 221, §§ 2, 3; 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to transportation expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-103

.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (b) through (h), which read:
“(b)
There is created within the department an advisory council of not more than eleven (11) members appointed by the governor. Each member shall serve a two (2) year term. The council shall be composed of:
(i)
One (1) member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate; (ii)
One (1) member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (iii)
Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3. (iv)
One (1) member recommended by each of the divisional councils within the department; (v)
Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3. (vi)
Up to four (4) members at large. (c)
Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3. (d)
The departmental advisory council shall meet at least two (2) times each year. (e)
The governor may remove any member of the departmental advisory council as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. (f)
At the first meeting of the departmental advisory council, and annually thereafter when new appointments are made, a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary shall be selected from among the membership by vote of the council members. (g)
Any vacancy caused by the death, removal, resignation or disqualification of any appointed member of the departmental advisory council shall be filled by the governor appointing a successor. (h)
Members of the departmental advisory council shall not receive compensation for their services, but when actually engaged in the performance of their duties, they shall receive travel expenses, per diem and mileage expenses in the same manner and amount as employees of the state.”

§ 9-2-108.
Director of department; appointment; removal; duties.

With the advice and consent of the senate the governor shall appoint a director for the department who shall serve under the direction of the governor and who may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The director shall:

Manage and supervise the department;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 149, § 1.

Appointments and terms under this section shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 93, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 9-160.18; Laws 1977, ch. 176, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-116; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1999, ch. 149, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision establishing management council, see §

28-8-102

.

As to authority of management council to appoint select committees, under certain circumstances, see §

28-8-104

.

As to powers and duties of management council, or any committee thereof, with respect to review of administrative rules and regulations, see §§

28-9-102

through

28-9-108

.

§ 9-2-109.
Vocational rehabilitation; definitions.

As used in W.S.

9-2-109

through

9-2-115

:

“Division” means the staff within the department of workforce services who administer vocational rehabilitation programs and provide vocational rehabilitation services;

“Eligible” means a certification that:

The individual has a physical or mental impairment which constitutes or results in a substantial impediment to employment of the individual;

Vocational rehabilitation services may reasonably be expected to benefit the individual in terms of an employment outcome; and

The individual requires vocational rehabilitation services to prepare for, secure, retain or regain employment.

“Individual with a significant disability” means an individual:

Who has a severe physical or mental disability which seriously limits one (1) or more functional capacities in terms of an employment outcome;

Whose vocational rehabilitation can be expected to require multiple vocational rehabilitation services over an extended period of time; and

Who has one (1) or more physical or mental disabilities resulting from amputation, arthritis, autism, blindness, burn injury, cancer, cerebral palsy, cystic fibrosis, deafness, head injury, heart disease, hemiplegia, hemophilia, respiratory or pulmonary dysfunction, intellectual disability, mental illness, multiple sclerosis, muscular dystrophy, musculoskeletal disorders, neurological disorders (including stroke and epilepsy), paraplegia, quadriplegia and other spinal cord conditions, sickle cell anemia, specific learning disability, end stage renal disease or another disability or combination of disabilities determined on the basis of an assessment for determining eligibility and vocational rehabilitation needs to cause comparable substantial functional limitation.

“This act” means W.S.

9-2-109

through

9-2-115

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 225, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-303; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 202; 1975, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-3-201

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1993, ch. 222, § 1; 1999, ch. 46, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3; 2008, ch. 70, § 1.

The 2008 amendment

substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in (a)(iii)(C).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Workforce Investment Act. —

The Federal Workforce Investment Act is codified as 29 USC 2801 et seq.

Cited

in

State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 9-2-110.
Division of vocational rehabilitation; administrative duties.

This act [§§

9-2-109

through

9-2-115

] shall be administered by the division. In administering this act, the division shall:

Make regulations necessary to implement this act;

Certify for disbursement funds available for the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 225, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-304; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 203; 1975, ch. 115, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-3-202

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.